Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB327.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On or before the fifteenth day of each month, every retail electric supplier shall
file a retail electric service disconnection report with the commission detailing all
service disconnections for their residential customers that occurred during the
previous calendar month by date, time of disconnection, and reason for
disconnection. The report shall show disconnections as a proportion of the total
number of residential accounts for the reporting period.
(2) The retail electric service disconnection report shall include the reasons for each
disconnection, including but not limited to disconnection based on:
(a) A customer's request for discontinuance or transfer service;
(b) Nonpayment of bills, including noncompliance with a deferred payment
plan or nonpayment of deposit; or
(c) Violation of a retail electric supplier's terms of service or using the service
in a manner which interferes with other customers.
(3) Each retail service disconnection shall show:
(a) The high and low recorded temperature issued by the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration, National Weather Service for the retail service
disconnection date and location; and
(b) Whether the retail electric service was reconnected, if the reconnection was
within twenty-four (24) hours of the disconnection.
(4) The monthly retail electric service disconnection report shall be made available to
the public on the commission's website.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/7/2024 3:56 PM Jacketed